packages/hunspell-reader/dictionaries/eu/eu.aff
FLAG num
SFX 188 0 nindezagua/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 nindezaguen .
SFX 188 0 nindezaguen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 nindezague/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 nindezagukea/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 nindezagukek .
SFX 188 0 nindezagukek/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 nindezagukena/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 nindezaguken .
SFX 188 0 nindezaguken/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 nindezagukete .
SFX 188 0 nindezagukete/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 nindezagukezue .
SFX 188 0 nindezagukezue/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 nindezagukezu .
SFX 188 0 nindezagukezu/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 nindezaguke .
SFX 188 0 nindezaguke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 nindezaguk .
SFX 188 0 nindezaguk/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 nindezaguna/1,408 .
SFX 188 0 nindezagun .
SFX 188 0 nindezagun/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 nindezaguten .
SFX 188 0 nindezaguten/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 nindezagute .
SFX 188 0 nindezagute/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 nindezaguzuen .
SFX 188 0 nindezaguzuen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 nindezaguzue .
SFX 188 0 nindezaguzue/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 nindezaguzun .
SFX 188 0 nindezaguzun/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 nindezaguzu .
SFX 188 0 nindezaguzu/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 nindezagu .
SFX 188 0 nindezagu/1,409 .
SFX 188 0 nindoakeen .
SFX 188 0 nindoakeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 nindoakee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 nindoake .
SFX 188 0 nindoake/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 nindoakiakeen .
SFX 188 0 nindoakiakeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 nindoakiakee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 nindoakiake .
SFX 188 0 nindoakiake/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 nindoakian .
SFX 188 0 nindoakian/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 nindoakia/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 nindoakiekeen .
SFX 188 0 nindoakiekeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 nindoakiekee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 nindoakieke .
SFX 188 0 nindoakieke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 nindoakien .
SFX 188 0 nindoakien/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 nindoakie .
SFX 188 0 nindoakie/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 nindoakik .
SFX 188 0 nindoakinakeen .
SFX 188 0 nindoakinakeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 nindoakinakee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 nindoakinake .
SFX 188 0 nindoakinake/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 nindoakinan .
SFX 188 0 nindoakinan/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 nindoakina/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 nindoakin .
SFX 188 0 nindoakiokeen .
SFX 188 0 nindoakiokeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 nindoakiokee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 nindoakioke .
SFX 188 0 nindoakioke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 nindoakion .
SFX 188 0 nindoakion/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 nindoakio .
SFX 188 0 nindoakio/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 nindoakizuekeen .
SFX 188 0 nindoakizuekeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 nindoakizuekee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 nindoakizueke .
SFX 188 0 nindoakizueke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 nindoakizuen .
SFX 188 0 nindoakizuen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 nindoakizue .
SFX 188 0 nindoakizue/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 nindoakizukeen .
SFX 188 0 nindoakizukeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 nindoakizukee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 nindoakizuke .
SFX 188 0 nindoakizuke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 nindoakizun .
SFX 188 0 nindoakizun/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 nindoakizu .
SFX 188 0 nindoakizu/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 nindoan .
SFX 188 0 nindoan/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 nindoa .
SFX 188 0 nindoa/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 ninduan .
SFX 188 0 ninduan/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 ninduan .
SFX 188 0 ninduan/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 nindua/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 nindua/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 ninduen .
SFX 188 0 ninduen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 ninduen .
SFX 188 0 ninduen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 nindue/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 nindue/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 nindukaan .
SFX 188 0 nindukaan/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 nindukaa/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 nindukakean .
SFX 188 0 nindukakean/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 nindukakea/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 nindukakeen .
SFX 188 0 nindukakeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 nindukakee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 nindukakek .
SFX 188 0 nindukakek/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 nindukakenan .
SFX 188 0 nindukakenan/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 nindukakena/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 nindukaken .
SFX 188 0 nindukaken/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 nindukaketen .
SFX 188 0 nindukaketen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 nindukakete .
SFX 188 0 nindukakete/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 nindukakezue .
SFX 188 0 nindukakezue/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 nindukakezun .
SFX 188 0 nindukakezun/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 nindukakezu .
SFX 188 0 nindukakezu/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 nindukake .
SFX 188 0 nindukake/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 nindukak .
SFX 188 0 nindukana/1,408 .
SFX 188 0 nindukan .
SFX 188 0 nindukan/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 nindukaten .
SFX 188 0 nindukaten/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 nindukate .
SFX 188 0 nindukate/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 nindukazuen .
SFX 188 0 nindukazuen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 nindukazue .
SFX 188 0 nindukazue/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 nindukazun .
SFX 188 0 nindukazun/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 nindukazu .
SFX 188 0 nindukazu/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 ninduka .
SFX 188 0 ninduka/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 nindukezuen .
SFX 188 0 nindukezuen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 nindukezue/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 ninduk .
SFX 188 0 ninduk .
SFX 188 0 nindunan .
SFX 188 0 nindunan/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 nindunan .
SFX 188 0 nindunan/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 ninduna/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 ninduna/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 nindun .
SFX 188 0 nindun .
SFX 188 0 ninduten .
SFX 188 0 ninduten/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 ninduten .
SFX 188 0 ninduten/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 nindute .
SFX 188 0 nindute/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 nindute .
SFX 188 0 nindute/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 ninduzuen .
SFX 188 0 ninduzuen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 ninduzuen .
SFX 188 0 ninduzuen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 ninduzue .
SFX 188 0 ninduzue/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 ninduzue .
SFX 188 0 ninduzue/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 ninduzun .
SFX 188 0 ninduzun/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 ninduzun .
SFX 188 0 ninduzun/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 ninduzu .
SFX 188 0 ninduzu/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 ninduzu .
SFX 188 0 ninduzu/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 nindu .
SFX 188 0 nindu/1,407 .
SFX 188 0 nindu .
SFX 188 0 nindu/1,407 .
SFX 188 0 nintekeen .
SFX 188 0 nintekeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 nintekee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 ninteke .
SFX 188 0 ninteke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 nintzaian .
SFX 188 0 nintzaian/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 nintzaian .
SFX 188 0 nintzaian/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 nintzaia/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 nintzaia/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 nintzaien .
SFX 188 0 nintzaien/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 nintzaien .
SFX 188 0 nintzaien/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 nintzaie .
SFX 188 0 nintzaie/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 nintzaie .
SFX 188 0 nintzaie/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 nintzaik .
SFX 188 0 nintzaik .
SFX 188 0 nintzainan .
SFX 188 0 nintzainan/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 nintzainan .
SFX 188 0 nintzainan/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 nintzaina/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 nintzaina/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 nintzain .
SFX 188 0 nintzain .
SFX 188 0 nintzaion .
SFX 188 0 nintzaion/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 nintzaion .
SFX 188 0 nintzaion/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 nintzaio .
SFX 188 0 nintzaio/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 nintzaio .
SFX 188 0 nintzaio/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 nintzaizuen .
SFX 188 0 nintzaizuen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 nintzaizuen .
SFX 188 0 nintzaizuen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 nintzaizue .
SFX 188 0 nintzaizue/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 nintzaizue .
SFX 188 0 nintzaizue/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 nintzaizun .
SFX 188 0 nintzaizun/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 nintzaizun .
SFX 188 0 nintzaizun/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 nintzaizu .
SFX 188 0 nintzaizu/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 nintzaizu .
SFX 188 0 nintzaizu/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 nintzakean .
SFX 188 0 nintzakean/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 nintzakea/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 nintzakeen .
SFX 188 0 nintzakeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 nintzakee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 nintzakek .
SFX 188 0 nintzakek/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 nintzakenan .
SFX 188 0 nintzakenan/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 nintzakena/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 nintzaken .
SFX 188 0 nintzaken/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 nintzaketen .
SFX 188 0 nintzaketen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 nintzakete .
SFX 188 0 nintzakete/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 nintzakezuen .
SFX 188 0 nintzakezuen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 nintzakezue .
SFX 188 0 nintzakezue/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 nintzakezun .
SFX 188 0 nintzakezun/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 nintzakezu .
SFX 188 0 nintzakezu/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 nintzake .
SFX 188 0 nintzake/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 nintzak .
SFX 188 0 nintzan .
SFX 188 0 nintzate .
SFX 188 0 nintzazue .
SFX 188 0 nintzazu .
SFX 188 0 nintza .
SFX 188 0 nintzen .
SFX 188 0 nintzen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 nintzen .
SFX 188 0 nintzen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 nintze/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 nintze/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 nintz .
SFX 188 0 nintz/1,407 .
SFX 188 0 nintz .
SFX 188 0 nintz/1,407 .
SFX 188 0 nin .
SFX 188 0 nin .
SFX 188 0 nioen .
SFX 188 0 nioen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 nioezen .
SFX 188 0 nioezen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 nioeze/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 nioe/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 niokeena/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 niokeen .
SFX 188 0 niokeen/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 niokezena/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 niokezen .
SFX 188 0 niokezen/1,402 .
SFX 188 0 niokez .
SFX 188 0 niokez/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 nioke .
